Arkansas, session 2025, HB1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-79-2703(a), concerning coverage for an
ambulance service under the Arkansas Triage, Treat, and Transport to
Alternative Destination Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) On and after January 1, 2024, a A healthcare insurer that offers,
issues, or renews a health benefit plan in this state shall provide coverage
for an ambulance service to:
(1) An ambulance service to:
(A) Treat an enrollee in place if the ambulance service is
coordinating the care of the enrollee through telemedicine with a physician
for a medical-based complaint or with a behavioral health specialist for a
behavioral-based complaint; or
(B)(2) Triage or triage and transport an enrollee to an
alternative destination if the ambulance service is coordinating the care of
the enrollee through telemedicine with a physician for a medical-based
complaint or with a behavioral health specialist for a behavioral-based
complaint; or
*ANS032*
02-19-2025 14:06:09 ANS032

As Engrossed: S2/19/25 HB1286
(2)(3) An Treat an enrollee in place if an encounter between an
ambulance service and enrollee that results in no transport of the enrollee
if when:
(A) The enrollee declines to be transported against
medical advice; and
(B) The ambulance service is coordinating the care of the
enrollee through telemedicine with a physician for a medical-based complaint
or with a behavioral health specialist for a behavioral-based complaint.

/s/L. Johnson


























02-19-2025 14:06:09 ANS032